Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.070

Costs as charge against assets.

(1) All costs incident to supervisory direction and the conservatorship shall be fixed and determined by the director and shall be a charge against the assets of the state trust company to be allowed and paid as the director may determine.

(2) A member of the board of directors of a state trust company or, in the case of a limited liability trust company, a managing participant, may, pursuant to notice and adjudication under chapter 30B.10 RCW, be found liable for such costs incurred that have not been recouped by the director out of the assets of the state trust company.

[ 2019 c 389 s 86.]